Florida, session 2026, SB1240.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 627.4025, Florida 27 Statutes, is amended to read: 28 627.4025âResidential coverage and hurricane coverage 29 defined.â 30 (1)âResidential coverage includes both personal lines and 31 commercial lines coverage. Personal lines residential coverage 32 includes residential coverage, which consists of the type of 33 coverage provided by homeowner, mobile home owner, dwelling, 34 tenant, condominium unit owner, cooperative unit owner, and 35 similar personal lines residential policies., and Commercial 36 lines residential coverage includes, which consists of the type 37 of coverage provided by condominium association, cooperative 38 association, apartment building, and similar commercial lines 39 residential policies, including policies covering the common 40 elements of a homeowners association. Residential coverage for 41 personal lines and commercial lines as set forth in this section 42 includes policies that provide coverage for particular perils 43 such as windstorm and hurricane or coverage for insurer 44 insolvency or deductibles. 45 Section 2.âSubsection (3) is added to section 627.418, 46 Florida Statutes, to read: 47 627.418âValidity of noncomplying contracts.â 48 (3)âAn insurer may not impose or enforce any policy 49 condition or requirement that is not authorized by this 50 insurance code unless the condition or requirement has been 51 submitted to and approved by the office. Any such unauthorized 52 condition or requirement is void and unenforceable. If a policy 53 contains any condition or requirement not authorized by this 54 insurance code but approved by the office, the insurer must 55 clearly disclose such provision to the insured at the time of 56 issuance along with necessary definitions to understand the 57 provisions of the policy and the steps required for compliance 58 with the provisions of the policy, using plain language, and 59 must allow the insured to cancel the policy within 10 days after 60 receipt at no cost. The disclosure must include the following 61 notice, printed in bold type: 62 63 IMPORTANT NOTICE: SOME PROVISIONS IN THIS POLICY ARE 64 NOT ESTABLISHED BY FLORIDA STATUTES. FAILURE TO MEET 65 THESE CONTRACTUAL REQUIREMENTS MAY AFFECT YOUR 66 COVERAGE OR RESULT IN CLAIM DELAY OR DENIAL. YOU HAVE 67 RIGHTS UNDER FLORIDA LAW. YOU MAY CANCEL THIS POLICY 68 WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT AT NO COST. 69 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 627.426, Florida 70 Statutes, is amended to read: 71 627.426âClaims administration.â 72 (2)âA liability insurer may shall not be permitted to deny 73 coverage based on a particular coverage defense unless all of 74 the following conditions are met: 75 (a)1.âWithin 30 days after the liability insurer knew or 76 should have known of the coverage defense, written notice of 77 reservation of rights to assert a coverage defense is given to 78 the named insured by United States postal proof of mailing, 79 registered or certified mail, or other mailing using the 80 Intelligent Mail barcode or other similar tracking method used 81 or approved by the United States Postal Service sent to the last 82 known address of the insured or by hand delivery. Such notice of 83 reservation of rights must include all the following: 84 a.âA clear statement of the factual issue giving rise to 85 the reservation of rights. 86 b.âAn explanation, in plain language, of why the issue may 87 affect coverage. 88 c.âA description of any additional information or 89 documentation needed from the insured. 90 d.âA description of the next steps in the investigative 91 process and the expected timeframes for completing those steps. 92 e.âIf the insurer determines that fraud or 93 misrepresentation may affect the claim, identification of the 94 specific facts supporting that determination. 95 2.âA notice of reservation of rights given under this 96 section may not be used to extend, delay, or suspend the payment 97 of a covered loss or any statutory deadline for paying or 98 denying a claim under this code.; and 99 (b)âWithin 60 days after of compliance with paragraph (a) 100 or receipt of a summons and complaint naming the insured as a 101 defendant, whichever is later, but in no case later than 30 days 102 before trial, the insurer: 103 1.âGives written notice to the named insured by United 104 States postal proof of mailing, registered or certified mail, or 105 other mailing using the Intelligent Mail barcode or other 106 similar tracking method used or approved by the United States 107 Postal Service of its refusal to defend the insured; 108 2.âObtains from the insured a nonwaiver agreement following 109 full disclosure of the specific facts and policy provisions upon 110 which the coverage defense is asserted and the duties, 111 obligations, and liabilities of the insurer during and following 112 the pendency of the subject litigation; or 113 3.âRetains independent counsel which is mutually agreeable 114 to the parties. Reasonable fees for the counsel may be agreed 115 upon between the parties or, if no agreement is reached, shall 116 be set by the court. 117 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 118 627.70131, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 119 627.70131âInsurerâs duty to acknowledge communications 120 regarding claims; investigation.â 121 (7)(a)âWithin 30 60 days after an insurer receives notice 122 of an initial, reopened, or supplemental property insurance 123 claim from a policyholder, the insurer shall pay or deny such 124 claim or a portion of the claim unless the failure to pay or 125 deny is caused by factors beyond the insurerâs control of the 126 insurer. The insurer shall provide a clear, written reasonable 127 explanation in writing to the policyholder which outlines the 128 reasoning of the basis in the insurance policy, in relation to 129 the facts or applicable law, for the payment, denial, or partial 130 denial of the a claim, referencing relevant sections of the 131 insurance policy, applicable facts, or laws. Such explanation 132 may not be solely a recitation of policy provisions without 133 application of those provisions to the facts of the claim. If 134 the insurerâs claim payment is less than specified in any 135 insurerâs detailed estimate of the amount of the loss, the 136 insurer must provide a reasonable explanation in writing of the 137 difference to the policyholder. Any payment for of an initial or 138 supplemental claim or portion of such claim made 60 days after 139 the insurer receives notice of the claim, or made after the 140 expiration of any additional timeframe provided to pay or deny a 141 claim or a portion of a claim made pursuant to an order of the 142 office finding factors beyond the insurerâs control of the 143 insurer, whichever is later, bears interest at the rate set 144 forth in s. 55.03. Interest begins to accrue from the date the 145 insurer receives notice of the claim. If the insurer fails to 146 pay the full amount owed on the claim within 90 days after the 147 insurer receives notice of the claim or within any extended 148 timeframe authorized by order of the office, the insurer has an 149 uncontestable obligation to pay the amount owed, together with 150 interest as provided in this subsection and an additional equal 151 interest penalty. The department may enforce such obligation. 152 The provisions of this subsection may not be waived, voided, or 153 nullified by the terms of the insurance policy. If there is a 154 right to prejudgment interest, the insured must select whether 155 to receive prejudgment interest or interest under this 156 subsection. Interest is payable when the claim or portion of the 157 claim is paid, even if the payment is contingent upon a release. 158 Failure to comply with this subsection constitutes a violation 159 of this code. However, failure to comply with this subsection 160 does not form the sole basis for a private cause of action. 161 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.